Maryland, session 2025, HB0369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–201.1.
(a) This section applies only in Prince George’s County.
(b) Subject to the provisions of subsection [(e)] (D) of this section, the County
Superintendent of the Prince George’s County public school system shall be[:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0369*

HOUSE BILL 369
(1) Selected by the County Executive in accordance with subsection (c) of
this section; and
(2) Appointed] SELECTED by A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF the
county board FROM AMONG THE CANDIDATES CONSIDERED BY THE COUNTY BOARD
after agreement on contract terms negotiated by the chair of the county board.
[(c) (1) The County Executive shall select a County Superintendent from a list
of three nominees recommended by a search committee that is composed of:
(i) One member of the State Board, appointed by the State
Superintendent; and
(ii) Two residents of Prince George’s County, appointed by the
Governor.
(2) The search committee shall be chaired by a member selected by the
State Superintendent.]
[(d)] (C) (1) The term of the County Superintendent is 4 years beginning on
July 1.
(2) The County Superintendent continues to serve until a successor is
[appointed and qualifies] SELECTED.
(3) By February 1 of the year in which a term ends, the County
Superintendent shall notify the [County Executive and the] county board if the County
Superintendent is a candidate for [reappointment] ANOTHER TERM.
(4) (i) In the year a term begins, [the County Executive shall select a
County Superintendent between February 1 and June 1, and] the county board shall
complete the [appointment] SELECTION OF THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT on or
before June 30.
(ii) If the [County Executive] COUNTY BOARD decides to select the
incumbent County Superintendent, the county board shall complete the [reappointment]
SELECTION no later than March 1 of that year.
(5) If the county board is unable to [appoint] SELECT a County
Superintendent by July 1 of the year a term begins, the provisions of subsection [(f)] (E) of
this section apply.
[(e) (1)] (D) An individual may not be [appointed] SELECTED as County
Superintendent unless the individual:

HOUSE BILL 369 3
[(i) Is eligible to be issued a certificate for the office by the State
Superintendent;
(ii)] (1) Has graduated from an accredited college or university;
and
[(iii)] (2) Has completed 2 years of graduate work at an accredited
college or university, including public school administration, supervision, and methods of
teaching.
[(2) The appointment of the County Superintendent is not valid unless
approved in writing by the State Superintendent.
(3) If the State Superintendent disapproves an appointment, the State
Superintendent shall give the reasons for disapproval in writing to the county board and
the County Executive.]
[(f)] (E) If a vacancy occurs in the office of County Superintendent, [the County
Executive shall select and] the county board shall [appoint] SELECT an interim County
Superintendent to serve until July 1 after the [appointment] SELECTION.
[(g)] (F) On notification of pending criminal charges against the County
Superintendent as provided under § 4–206 of this subtitle, the county board may suspend
the County Superintendent with pay until the final disposition of the criminal charges.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.